District of Columbia statutes.
1-321.04

Authority to fix and change licensing periods; proration of fee.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized, after a public hearing, to fix and change from time to time the period for which any license, certificate, or registration authorized by any section set forth in § 1-321.02 may be issued. Upon change of a license, certificate or registration period, the fee for any such license, certificate, or registration shall be prorated on the basis of the time covered.

July 14, 1956, 70 Stat. 534, ch. 590, § 4
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-72, § 2, 24 DCR 7065
1981 Ed., § 1-351.
1973 Ed., § 1-257.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(16) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.